Tennessee, session 114, SB0890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-2-101(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "ten (10) working days" and substituting "ten (10) calendar days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0890
000962
- 1 -